Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB425.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189.993 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates KRS 189.045 shall be fined not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of KRS 189.095 shall be
fined sixty dollars ($60) and costs of prosecution.
(3) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 189.205 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(4) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 189.375 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(5) Any person who violates KRS 189.505 shall:
(a) For the first offense:
1. Be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000)[not less than sixty dollars ($60)
nor more than two hundred dollars ($200)] or be imprisoned for not
more than thirty (30) days, or both; and
Page 1 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 425/GA
2. In accordance with KRS 70.155 or 82.625, have any motor vehicle
used by the person in the commission of the violation impounded for
not less than six (6) months; and
(b) For a second or subsequent offense:
1. Be fined two thousand dollars ($2,000) or be imprisoned for not more
than thirty (30) days, or both; and
2. Have any motor vehicle used by the person in the commission of the
violation forfeited to the Commonwealth and destroyed or sold at
public auction in accordance with Section 2 of this Act.
(6) Any person found violating any provision of KRS 189.820 or 189.830 is guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than
thirty-five dollars ($35).
(7) Any person who violates KRS 189.920 shall be fined not less than one hundred
dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned in the
county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. In the case of a private
vehicle not authorized to use emergency lights under KRS 189.920, all lighting and
other equipment used in violation of KRS 189.910 to 189.950 shall be confiscated
and forfeited to the county in which the offense occurred.
(8) Any person who violates KRS 189.930 shall be fined not less than sixty dollars
($60) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned in the county jail
for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.
(9) (a) Any person who violates KRS 189.940 shall be fined not less than sixty
dollars ($60) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned in
the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both.
(b) In the case of a private vehicle, except as outlined in subsection (11) of this
section, all lighting and other equipment used in violation of KRS 189.910 to
189.950 shall be confiscated and forfeited to the county in which the offense
Page 2 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 425/GA
occurred.
(10) (a) If a member of a regular or volunteer fire department, ambulance service, or
rescue squad violates [any provisions of ]subsection (6) of KRS 189.940, he
or she shall, in addition to any other penalty provided under KRS 189.990 or
this section, be:
1. Immediately dismissed from his or her membership or employment
with the fire department, ambulance service, or rescue squad; and
2. [shall be ]Disqualified from being employed by or being a member of
any fire department, ambulance service, or rescue squad in the
Commonwealth for a period of three (3) years.
(b) Upon conviction of a second offense he or she shall be permanently barred
from employment or membership in any fire department, ambulance service,
rescue squad, police department, or sheriff's office in the Commonwealth, nor
shall he or she be permitted to operate any public safety vehicle as defined in
KRS 189.910.
(11) (a) Any person who violates KRS 189.950(3) shall be fined one hundred dollars
($100) for the first offense, two hundred dollars ($200) for the second offense,
and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent offense.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, any person who
violates KRS 189.950 shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100)
nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned in the county
jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. In the case of a privately
owned vehicle, all lighting and other equipment used or installed in violation
of KRS 189.910 to 189.950 shall be confiscated and forfeited to the county in
which the offense occurred.
(12) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter for which no penalty is
otherwise provided shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than twenty dollars
Page 3 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 425/GA
($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, except that no
penalty shall be assessed for a violation of KRS 189.580(1)(b) or (6)(b).
(13) A[No] producer or processor of natural resources shall not allow the transporting of
natural resources over the highways of the Commonwealth in excess of the weight
limits without possessing a resource recovery road hauling permit. Violation for
hauling in excess of prescribed limits without possession of a permit or transporting
natural resources over prescribed limits of the resource recovery road hauling
permit shall be not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation and shall be deposited in the resource
recovery road fund.
Section 2. KRS 500.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 500.092, all property which is subject to forfeiture
under any section of the Kentucky Penal Code shall be disposed of in the following
manner:[accordance with this section.]
(a) Property other than firearms which is forfeited under any section of this code
may, upon order of the trial court, be destroyed by the sheriff of the county in
which the conviction was obtained;[.]
(b) Property other than firearms which is forfeited under any section of this code
may, upon order of the trial court, be sold at public auction. The expenses of
keeping and selling such property and the amount of all valid recorded liens
that are established by intervention as being bona fide shall be paid out of the
proceeds of the sale. The balance shall be paid to:
1. The state, if the property was seized by an agency of the state or peace
officer thereof;
2. The county, if the property was seized by the sheriff or an agency or
peace officer of the county;
3. The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, if the property was
Page 4 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 425/GA
seized by a peace officer of the Department of Fish and Wildlife or was
seized by any other officer for violation of KRS Chapter 150;
4. The city, if the property was seized by the city or by an agency or peace
officer thereof and the property was delivered to the city property clerk;
5. The city (ninety percent (90%) of the proceeds) and the sheriff (ten
percent (10%) of the proceeds), if the property was seized by the city or
by an agency or peace officer thereof and the property was delivered to
the sheriff or the county police;[ or]
6. The state, if the property was seized by any combination of agencies
listed above; or
7. The Crime Victims Compensation Board established under KRS
49.010, if the property is a motor vehicle seized by any agency or peace
officer thereof for a second or subsequent violation of KRS 189.505;[.]
(c) 1. Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms and ammunition to
innocent owners pursuant to this section, all firearms and ammunition
confiscated by a state or local law enforcement agency, all firearms
ordered forfeited by a court, and all abandoned firearms and ammunition
coming into the custody of a state or local law enforcement agency and
not retained for official use shall be transferred to the Department of
Kentucky State Police for disposition as provided by KRS 16.220;[.]
2. The transfer shall occur not more than ninety (90) days after the
abandonment of the firearm or ammunition to the law enforcement
agency or not more than ninety (90) days after its confiscation, unless a
court requires the firearm or ammunition for use as evidence, in which
case it shall be transferred to the Department of Kentucky State Police
not more than ninety (90) days following the order of forfeiture by the
court or after the court returns the firearm or ammunition from use as
Page 5 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 425/GA
evidence;[.]
3. Prior to the sale of any firearm or ammunition, the law enforcement
agency shall make a bona fide attempt to determine if the firearm or
ammunition to be sold has been stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained
from an innocent owner and return the firearm and ammunition to its
lawful innocent owner, unless that person is ineligible to purchase a
firearm under federal law; and[.]
4. This subsection relating to auction of firearms and ammunition shall not
apply to firearms and ammunition auctioned by the Department of Fish
and Wildlife that may be sold to individual purchasers residing in
Kentucky who are eligible under federal law to purchase firearms and
ammunition of the type auctioned;[.]
(d) If property which is forfeited under any section of this code is determined by
the trial court to be worthless, encumbered with liens in excess of its value, or
otherwise a burdensome asset, the court may abandon any interest in such
property. Property which is abandoned pursuant to this section shall be
returned to the lawful claimant upon payment of expenses for keeping the
property; and[.]
(e) 1. Property which is forfeited under any section of this code may, upon
order of the trial court, be retained for official use in the following
manner:[.]
a. Property which has been seized by an agency of the state may be
retained for official state use;[.]
b. Property which has been seized by an agency of county, city, or
urban-county government may be retained for official use by the
government whose agency seized the property or for official state
use; and[.]
Page 6 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 425/GA
c. Property seized by any other unit of government may be retained
only for official state use; and[.]
2. The expenses for keeping and transferring such property shall be paid by
the unit of government by which the property is retained.
(2) Money which has been obtained or conferred in violation of any section of this code
shall, upon conviction, be forfeited for the use of the state. This subsection shall not
apply when, during the course of the proceeding in which the conviction is
obtained, the person from whom said money was unlawfully acquired is identified.
(3) Property forfeited under any section of this code shall be disposed of in accordance
with this section only after being advertised pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. This
subsection shall not apply to property which is designed and suitable only for
criminal use or to money forfeited under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The trial court shall remit the forfeiture of property when the lawful claimant:
(a) Asserts his or her claim before disposition of the property pursuant to this
section;
(b) Establishes his or her legal interest in the property; and
(c) Establishes that the unlawful use of the property was without his or her
knowledge and consent. This subsection shall not apply to a lienholder of
record when the trial court elects to dispose of the property pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "lawful claimant" means owner or lienholder of record.
(6) (a) Before property which has had its identity obscured in violation of KRS
514.120 may be sold or retained for official use as provided in this section, the
court shall cause a serial or other identifying number to be placed thereon, and
a record of the number assigned shall be placed in the court order authorizing
the sale or retention of the property.
(b) This number shall be assigned, whenever applicable, in consultation with the
Page 7 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 425/GA
Department of Kentucky State Police and any other state or federal regulatory
agency.
(c) The purchaser of the property shall be given a document stating that the
property had been forfeited pursuant to law and that a number, shown on the
document, has been assigned which shall be deemed as compliance of the
owner with KRS 514.120.
(d) When property is returned to an owner pursuant to this section and its identity
has been obscured by another person in violation of KRS 514.120, the court
shall provide a document to the owner relieving him or her of liability for its
continued possession. This document shall serve as evidence of compliance
with KRS 514.120 by the owner or any person to whom he or she lawfully
disposes of the property.
(e) This section shall not apply to any person after property has been sold or
returned in compliance with this section who violates the provisions of KRS
514.120 with respect to that property.
(7) (a) Before forfeiture of any property under this section, [it shall be the duty of
]the trial court shall[to] determine if a lawful owner or claimant to the
property has been identified or is identifiable.
(b) If a lawful owner or claimant has been identified or is identifiable, the court
shall notify the owner or claimant that the property is being held and specify a
reasonable period of time during which the claim may be made or may, in lieu
thereof, order the return of the property to the lawful owner or claimant.
(c) If the lawful owner or claimant does not assert his or her claim to the property
after notification or if he or she renounces his or her claim to the property, the
property shall be disposed of as provided in this section.
(d) [It shall be the duty of ]All peace officers and other public officers or officials
having knowledge of the lawful owner or claimant of property subject to
Page 8 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 425/GA
forfeiture shall[to] report the same to the trial court before the act of forfeiture
occurs.
Page 9 of 9
HB042510.100 - 1824 - XXXX 3/16/2026 5:14 PM GA